Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1191.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 65.20.020 and 2010 c 161 s 1154 are each amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "Affixed" means that the manufactured home is installed in accordance with the installation standards in state law.(2) "Department" means the department of licensing.(3) "Eliminating the title" means to cancel an existing certificate of title issued by this state or a foreign jurisdiction or to waive the certificate of title required in chapter 46.12 RCW and recording the appropriate documents in the county real property records pursuant to this chapter.(4) "Homeowner" means the owner of a manufactured home.(5) "Land" means real property excluding the manufactured home.(6) "Manufactured home" or "mobile home" means a structure, designed and constructed to be transportable in one or more sections and is built on a permanent chassis and designed to be used as a dwelling with or without a permanent foundation when connected to the required utilities that include plumbing, heating, and electrical systems contained therein. The structure must comply with the national mobile home construction and safety standards act of 1974 as adopted by chapter 43.22 RCW if applicable. "Manufactured home" does not include a modular home. A structure which met the definition of a "manufactured home" at the time of manufacture is still considered to meet this definition notwithstanding that it is no longer transportable.(7) "Owner" means, when referring to a manufactured home that is titled, the person who is the registered owner. When referring to a ((mobile))manufactured home that is untitled pursuant to this chapter, the owner is the person who owns the land. When referring to land, the person may have fee simple title, have a leasehold estate of ((thirty-five))35 years or more, have an individual interest in a mobile home park as defined in RCW 59.22.020(5)(b), or be purchasing the ((property))land on a real estate contract. Owners include joint tenants, tenants in common, holders of legal life estates, and holders of remainder interests.(8) "Person" means any individual, trustee, partnership, corporation, or other legal entity. "Person" may refer to more than one individual or entity.(9) "Secured party" means the legal owner when referring to a titled mobile home, or the lender securing a loan through a mortgage, deed of trust, or real estate contract when referring to land or land containing an untitled manufactured home pursuant to this chapter.(10) "Security interest" means an interest in ((property))land or a manufactured home to secure payment of a loan made by a secured party to a borrower.(11) "Title" or "titled" means a certificate of title issued pursuant to chapter 46.12 RCW.Sec. 2. RCW 65.20.030 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-836 are each amended to read as follows:(1) When a manufactured home is sold or transferred on or after March 1, 1990, and when all ownership in the manufactured home is transferred through the sale or other transfer of the manufactured home to new owners, the manufactured home shall be real property when the new owners eliminate the title pursuant to this chapter. The manufactured home shall not be real property in any form, including fixture law, unless the title is eliminated under this chapter. Where any person who owned a used manufactured home on March 1, 1990, continues to own the manufactured home on or after March 1, 1990, the interests and rights of owners, secured parties, lienholders, and others in the manufactured home shall be based on the law prior to March 1, 1990, except where the owner voluntarily eliminates the title to the manufactured home by complying with this chapter. If the title to the manufactured home is eliminated under this chapter, the manufactured home shall be ((treated the same as a site-built structure and ownership shall be based on ownership of the))considered real property ((through real property law)). If the title to the manufactured home has not been eliminated under this chapter, ownership shall be based on chapter 46.12 RCW.(2) For purposes of perfecting and realizing upon security interests, manufactured homes shall always be treated as follows: (((1)))(a) If the title has not been eliminated under this chapter, security interests in the manufactured home shall be perfected only under chapter 62A.9A RCW in the case of a manufactured home held as inventory by a manufacturer or dealer or chapter 46.12 RCW in all other cases, and the lien shall be treated as securing personal property for purposes of realizing upon the security interest; or (((2)))(b) if the title has been eliminated under this chapter, a separate security interest in the manufactured home shall not exist, and the manufactured home shall only be secured as part of the real property through a mortgage, deed of trust, lease, or real estate contract.Sec. 3. RCW 65.20.050 and 1989 c 343 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department shall approve the application for elimination of the title when all requirements listed in RCW 65.20.040 have been satisfied and the registered and legal owners of the manufactured home have consented to the elimination of the title. After approval, the department shall have the approved application recorded in the county or counties in which the land is located and on which the manufactured home is affixed.(2) The county auditor shall record the approved application, and any other form prescribed by the department, in the county real property records. The manufactured home shall then be treated as real property ((as if it were a site-built structure)). Removal of the manufactured home from the land is prohibited unless the procedures set forth in RCW 65.20.070 are complied with.(3) The department shall cancel the title after verification that the county auditor has recorded the appropriate documents, and the department shall maintain a record of each manufactured home title eliminated under this chapter by vehicle identification number. The title is deemed eliminated on the date the appropriate documents are recorded by the county auditor.Sec. 4. RCW 65.20.060 and 1989 c 343 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:It is the responsibility of the owner, secured parties, and others to take action as necessary to protect their respective interests in conjunction with the elimination of the title or reissuance of a previously eliminated title.A manufactured home whose title has been eliminated shall be conveyed by deed, lease, or real estate contract and shall only be transferred together with the interest in the ((property))land to which it is affixed, unless procedures described in RCW 65.20.070 are completed.Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require a ((lender))secured party to consent to the elimination of the title of a manufactured home, or to retitling a manufactured home under RCW 65.20.070. The obligation of the ((lender))secured party to consent is governed solely by the agreement between the ((lender))secured party and the owner of the manufactured home. Absent any express written contractual obligation, a ((lender))secured party may withhold consent in the ((lender's))secured party's sole discretion. In addition, the homeowner shall comply with all reasonable requirements imposed by a ((lender))secured party for obtaining consent, and a ((lender))secured party may charge a reasonable fee for processing a request for consent.Sec. 5. RCW 65.20.070 and 1989 c 343 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:Before physical removal of an untitled manufactured home from the land the home is affixed to, the owner shall follow one of these two procedures:(1) Where a title is to be issued or the home has been destroyed:(a) The owner shall apply to the department for a title pursuant to chapter 46.12 RCW. In addition the owner shall provide:(i) An affidavit in the form prescribed by the department, signed by the owners of the land and all secured parties and other lienholders in the land consenting to the removal of the home;(ii) Payment of recording fees;(iii) A certification from a title insurance company listing the owners and lienholders in the land and dated within ((ten))10 days of the date of application for a new title under this subsection; and(iv) Any other information the department may require;(b) The owner shall apply for and obtain permits necessary to move a manufactured home including but not limited to the permit required by RCW 46.44.170, and comply with other regulations regarding moving a manufactured home; and(c) The department shall approve the application for title when the requirements of chapter 46.12 RCW and this subsection have been satisfied. Upon approval the department shall have the approved application and the affidavit recorded in the county or counties in which the land from which the home is being removed is located and the department shall issue a title. The title is deemed effective on the date the appropriate documents are recorded with the county auditor.(2) Where the manufactured home is to be moved to a new location but again will be affixed to land owned by the homeowner a new title need not be issued, but the following procedures must be complied with:(a) The owner shall apply to the department for a transfer in location of the manufactured home and if a new owner, a transfer in ownership by filing an application pursuant to RCW 65.20.040. In addition the owner shall include:(i) An affidavit in the form prescribed by the department signed by all of the owners ((of the real property from which the manufactured home is being moved indicating their consent)). The affidavit shall include the consent of all secured parties and other lienholders in the land from which the manufactured home is being moved;(ii) A legal description and property tax parcel number of the real property from which the home is being removed and a legal description and property tax parcel number of the land on which the home is being moved to; and(iii) A certification from a title insurance company listing the owners and lienholders in the land and dated within ((ten))10 days of the application for transfer in location under this subsection;(b) The owner shall apply for and obtain permits necessary to move a manufactured home including but not limited to RCW 46.44.170, and comply with other regulations regarding moving a manufactured home; and(c) After approval, including verification that the owners, secured parties, and other lienholders have consented to the move, the department shall have the approved application recorded in the county or counties in which the land from which the home is being removed and the land to which the home is being moved is located.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. This act takes effect October 15, 2025.--- END ---